Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-332 Priority of distribution.
The priority of distribution of claims from the insurer's estate shall be in
accordance with the order in which each class of claims is herein set forth.
Every claim in each class shall be paid in full or adequate funds retained for
the payment before the members of the next class receive any payment. No
subclasses shall be established within any class. The order of distribution of
claims shall be:

(1) Class 1. The costs and expenses of
administration, including but not limited to the following:

(A) The actual and necessary costs of
preserving or recovering the assets of the insurer;

(B) Compensation for all services rendered in
the liquidation;

(C) Any necessary filing fees;

(D) The fees and mileage payable to
witnesses;

(E) Reasonable attorney's fees; and

(F) The reasonable expenses of a guaranty
fund or association, or foreign guaranty association in handling claims.

(2) Class 2. All claims under policies for losses
incurred, including third party claims, all claims against the insurer for
liability for bodily injury or for injury to or destruction of tangible
property which are not under policies, claims under nonassessable policies for
unearned premium or other premium refunds, and all claims of a guaranty fund or
association or foreign guaranty association. All claims under life insurance
and annuity policies, whether for death proceeds, annuity proceeds, or
investment values shall be treated as loss claims. That portion of any loss,
indemnification for which is provided by other benefits or advantages recovered
by the claimant, shall not be included in this class, other than benefits or
advantages recovered or recoverable in discharge of familial obligations of
support or by way of succession at death or as proceeds of life insurance, or
as gratuities. No payment by an employer to its employee shall be treated as a
gratuity.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the following
claims shall be excluded from class 2:

(A) Obligations of the insolvent insurer
arising out of reinsurance contracts;

(B) Obligations incurred after the expiration
date of the insurance policy or after the policy has been replaced by the
insured or canceled at the insured's request or after the policy has been
canceled as provided in this section. Notwithstanding this paragraph, earned
premium claims on policies, (other than reinsurance agreements) shall not be
excluded;

(C) Obligations to insurers, insurance pools,
or underwriting associations, and their claims for contribution, indemnity, or
subrogation, equitable or otherwise;

(D) Any claim that is in excess of any
applicable limits provided in the insurance policy issued by the insolvent
insurer; and

(E) Any amount accrued as punitive or
exemplary damages unless expressly covered under the terms of the policy.

(3) Class 3. Claims of the federal government.

(4) Class 4. Debts due to employees for services
performed to the extent that they do not exceed $1,000 and represent payment
for services performed within one year before the filing of the petition for
liquidation. Officers and directors shall not be entitled to the benefit of
this priority. The priority shall be in lieu of any other similar priority
which may be authorized by law as to wages or compensation of employees.

(5) Class 5. Claims of general creditors.

(6) Class 6. Claims of any state or local
government. Claims including those of any governmental body for a penalty or
forfeiture, shall be allowed in this class only to the extent of the pecuniary
loss sustained from the act, transaction, or proceeding out of which the
penalty or forfeiture arose, with reasonable and actual costs occasioned
thereby. The remainder of the claims shall be postponed to the class of claims
under paragraph (8).

(7) Class 7. Claims filed late or any other claims
other than claims under paragraphs (8) and (9).

(8) Class 8. Surplus or contribution notes, or
similar obligations, and premium refunds on assessable policies. Payments to
members of domestic mutual insurance companies shall be limited in accordance
with the law.

(9) Class 9. The claims of shareholders or other
owners. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as superseded by c 349, §11; am L 1996, c 121,
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next